District of Columbia statutes.
4-118

Commitments by Family Division of Superior Court; placement by Board.

The judges of the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia are hereby authorized and empowered, at their discretion, to commit to the custody and care of the Board of Public Welfare of the District of Columbia children under 17 years of age who shall be convicted of petty crimes or misdemeanors which may be punishable with fine or imprisonment; and said Board of Public Welfare shall place, under contract, such children in such suitable homes, institutions, or training schools for the care of children as it may deem wise and proper.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1095, ch. 847, § 1
Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 73, ch. 960, § 8
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 210, ch. 58, § 11
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(c)
Family Division proceedings, proceeding regarding delinquency, neglect, or need of supervision, see § 16-2301 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 3-119.
1973 Ed., § 3-120.
Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.